Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.225

Blind licensees in the business enterprises program—Plan of health insurance.

(1) The public employees' benefits board shall offer a plan of health insurance to blind licensees who are actively operating facilities and participating in the business enterprises program established in RCW 74.18.200 through 74.18.230, and maintained by the department of services for the blind. The plan of health insurance benefits must be the same or substantially similar to the plan of health insurance benefits offered to state employees under this chapter. Enrollment will be at the option of each individual licensee or vendor, under rules established by the public employees' benefits board.

(2) All costs incurred by the state or the public employees' benefits board for providing health insurance coverage to active blind vendors, excluding family participation, under subsection (1) of this section may be paid for from net proceeds from vending machine operations in public buildings under RCW 74.18.230.

(3) Money from the business enterprises program under the federal Randolph-Sheppard Act may not be used for family participation in the health insurance benefits provided under this section. Family insurance benefits are the sole responsibility of the individual blind vendors.

[ 2018 c 260 s 18; 2002 c 71 s 1.]